Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 9 Fair Employment Practices
§ 27-9-106.
Filing of complaint; determination; appeal for hearing.

Any person claiming to be aggrieved by a discriminatory or unfair employment practice may, personally or through his attorney, make, sign and file with the department within six (6) months of the alleged violation a verified, written complaint in duplicate which shall state the name and address of the person, employer, employment agency or labor organization alleged to have committed the discriminatory or unfair employment practice, and which shall set forth the particulars of the claim and contain other information as shall be required by the department. The department shall investigate to determine the validity of the charges and issue a determination thereupon.

through (j) Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 162, § 2.

If the employer, employment agency, labor organization or employee is aggrieved by the department’s determination, the aggrieved party may request a fair hearing. The fair hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The department shall issue an order within fourteen (14) days of the decision being rendered, requiring the employer, employment agency or labor organization to comply with the hearing officer’s decision. If the employer, employment agency or labor organization does not timely appeal or comply with the order within thirty (30) days, the department may petition the appropriate district court for enforcement of the order.

Where the hearing officer determines that the employer, employment agency or labor organization has engaged in any discriminatory or unfair employment practice as defined in this chapter, the hearing officer’s decision may:

Require the employer, employment agency or labor organization to cease and desist from the discriminatory or unfair practice;

Require remedial action which may include hiring, retaining, reinstating or upgrading of employees, referring of applications for employment by a respondent employment agency or the restoration to membership by a respondent labor organization;

Require the posting of notices, the making of reports as to the manner of compliance and any other relief that the hearing officer deems necessary and appropriate to make the complainant whole; or

Require the employer, employment agency or labor organization to pay backpay or front pay.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 170, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 27-262; Laws 1979, ch. 137, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 186, § 1; 2005, ch. 95, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “six (6) months” for “ninety (90) days” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Administrative procedures must be followed. —

Because discrimination based on “sex” or “gender” under the Wyoming Fair Employment Practices Act (FEPA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-9-101

et seq., includes sexual harassment, the employee was required to follow administrative procedures provided in the FEPA and exhaust her administrative remedies rather than pursue a tort action for retaliatory discharge in violation of public policy. Hoflund v. Airport Golf Club, 2005 WY 17, 105 P.3d 1079,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2005).

Cited in

Apodaca v. Safeway, Inc., 2015 WY 51, 2015 Wyo. LEXIS
57 (Mar. 31, 2015).

Applied

in

World Mart, Inc. v. Ditsch, 855 P.2d 1228,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1993).

Stated

in

Shenefield v. Sheridan County Sch. Dist., 544 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Damages recoverable for wrongful discharge of at-will employee, 44 ALR4th 1131.

Damages and other relief under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap, 78 ALR4th 435.

Availability and scope of punitive damages under state employment discrimination law, 81 ALR5th 367.

Effect of prior state court judgment upon action in Federal District Court for unlawful employment practices under Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC §§ 2000e et seq.), 51 ALR Fed 829.

When will federal government employee be excused from 30-day limitation period, established by equal employment opportunity commission regulation (29 CFR § 1613.214-(a)(1)(i)), for bringing matters relating to employment discrimination to attention of equal employment opportunity counselor, 57 ALR Fed 116.

Effect on employment discrimination action of failure of equal employment opportunity commission to timely serve defendant with notice of charges as required by § 706(b) and (e) of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e-5(b) and (e)), 57 ALR Fed 565.

Apportionment among defendants of monetary awards to plaintiffs in suit under title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e et seq.), 58 ALR Fed 363.

Backpay as recoverable in action for refusal to hire in violation of 42 USC § 1983, 58 ALR Fed 667.

Sufficiency of notice to equal employment opportunity commission charging violation of Age Discrimination in Employment Act (29 USC §§ 621 et seq.), 72 ALR Fed 10.

Typicality requirement of Rule 23(a)(3) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure as to class representative in class action based on unlawful discrimination, 74 ALR Fed 42.

Award of “front pay” under § 7 of Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (29 USC § 626), 74 ALR Fed 745.

What constitutes impairment of proposed intervenor's interest to support intervention as matter of right under Rule 24(a)(2) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure in employment discrimination actions, 74 ALR Fed 895.

Right of complainant, under 42 USC § 2000e-5(f)(1), to appointment of attorney in employment discrimination action, 75 ALR Fed 369.

Damages for mental distress as recoverable in action against employer under § 301 of Labor Management Relations Act (29 USC § 185) or under § 502 of Employee Retirement Income Security Act (29 USC § 1132), 77 ALR Fed 181.

Allowance of interest on award of attorney's fee under § 706(k) of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e-5(k)), 77 ALR Fed 272.

Action under title VII of 1964 Civil Rights Act (42 USC §§ 2000e et seq.) as precluding action under 42 USC § 1983 for employment discrimination by state or local government, 78 ALR Fed 492.

Reinstatement as remedy for discriminatory discharge or demotion under Age Discrimination in Employment Act (29 USC §§ 621 et seq.), 78 ALR Fed 575.

Preemption of state-law wrongful discharge claim, not arising from whistleblowing, by § 301(a) of Labor-Management Act of 1947 (29 U.S.C.A. § 185(a)), 184 ALR Fed 241.

§§ 27-9-107 and 27-9-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 162, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 170, §§ 7 and 8, related to judicial review and enforcement of the commission's decisions and appeal from a district court's decision to the supreme court.